Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin VETERAN RELOCATION BONUS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible veteran" means a person who: new text end new text begin (1) is a veteran, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 197.447; new text end new text begin (2) had their employment with the federal government involuntarily terminated on or after January 20, 2025; new text end new text begin (3) was not a resident of Minnesota on January 20, 2025, but establishes residency in Minnesota before January 1, 2027; and new text end new text begin (4) begins working at least 20 hours a week in a job that is principally located in Minnesota before January 1, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) "Program" means the veteran relocation bonus program created under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish a veteran relocation bonus program to pay relocation bonuses to eligible veterans to grow Minnesota's workforce. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grants to eligible veterans. new text end new text begin (a) To receive a relocation bonus, an eligible veteran must apply using a form designed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must award grants of $10,000 to eligible veterans on a rolling basis. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report to the legislature. new text end new text begin By March 1, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report on the veteran relocation bonus program to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over workforce development and veterans and as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; VETERAN RELOCATION BONUS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the veteran relocation bonus program. Of this appropriation, $50,000 is for outreach and promotion of the program to potentially eligible veterans. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end